Massachusetts, session 194th, H895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 91 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section after section 10A1/2:—Section 10A3/4. There is hereby established a
fund to be known as the Coastal Protection and Harbor Maintenance Revolving Fund to which
shall be credited such sums as may from time to time be provided by appropriation.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the department of
environmental management is hereby authorized and directed to utilize the appropriations
credited to this fund for providing financial assistance to local government units to meet debt
service obligations or bonds incurred by such local government units after January 1, 2021, to
finance costs of coastal protection and harbor maintenance projects, or portions thereof, which
have been approved by the department.As used in this section, the term “coastal protection and
of 3

harbor maintenance project” shall mean the planning, including study, professional consultation,
engineering, evaluation, preliminary and final design and pre-construction activity, including
construction, supervision and purchase of equipment for post-construction maintenance for
projects approved by the department that increase or maintain harbor access and maintain or
augment structures that provide protection to the coastline and development along the same. The
department shall promulgate regulations to define typical projects that are approved for
assistance and shall therein provide a process for municipalities to submit additional proposals
for consideration should a municipality believe that a project meets the criteria for a coastal
protection or harbor maintenance project but is not specifically defined as such in the
regulations. Subject to appropriation, the department shall provide financial assistance for each
coastal protection and harbor maintenance project or portion thereof authorized by this section in
such manner and under such terms and conditions as defined under regulations to be
promulgated by the department, including zero or low-interest loans to the municipality, in an
aggregate amount equal to 50 percent percent of the approved costs of such project or portion
thereof approved by the department of environmental management. This assistance shall not be
construed as a replacement and shall not be used in lieu of any other form of grant or other
assistance available through the department, but shall assist municipalities in affording and
financing their portion of approved and necessary projects.
The state treasurer shall enter into an agreement with the department to provide contract
assistance to the department in whatever maximum amount is appropriated by the
commonwealth per fiscal year. Subject to appropriation, the department is hereby authorized and
directed to report the total annual amount of assistance authorized in each current and subsequent
year to meet the provisions of this section and shall file the same with the house and senate
of 3

committees on ways and means no later than February first of each year, such report shall also
detail the number and aggregate amount of requests for assistance the department has received
and is unable to provide from this account due to exhaustion of available appropriations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and the department of environmental
management is directed to promulgate the rules and regulations required under this act within 90
days after the effective date of this act.
of 3